California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after July 1, 2015, gross income does not include an amount received as a loan forgiveness, grant, credit, rebate, voucher, or other financial incentive issued by the California Residential Mitigation Program or the California Earthquake Authority to assist a residential property owner or occupant with expenses paid, or obligations incurred, for earthquake
 loss mitigation.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “earthquake loss mitigation” means an activity that reduces seismic risks to a residential structure or its contents, or both. For purposes of structural seismic risk mitigation, a residential structure is either of the following:

(1) A structure described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087 of the Insurance Code.

(2) A residential building of not fewer than 2, but not more than 10, dwelling units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 323, Sec. 11.   (SB 102)   Effective September 22, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.8.

(a) Gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “qualified amount” includes any of the following:

(A) Amounts received by a qualified taxpayer during the remediation of the Carousel Housing Tract,
 located in Carson, California, from the Shell Oil Company for costs associated with temporary accommodations and relocation pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046. These costs include all amounts paid under the Temporary Living Assistance section of the Revised Remedial Action Plan, Relocation Plan, developed by URS Corporation for Shell Oil Products U.S., dated September 19, 2014.

(B) Amounts received by a qualified taxpayer paid under the Optional Real Estate Program of the Revised Remedial Action Plan, Relocation Plan, developed by URS Corporation for Shell Oil Products U.S., dated September 19, 2014.

(C) Any amounts received by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement arising out of the investigation, cleanup, or abatement of the waste discharged at the former Kast Property Tank Farm facility pursuant to California
 Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046.

(2) The term “qualified amount” does not include any reimbursed amounts representing any expenses related to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046 that were deducted under this part.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means any taxpayer that currently owns or previously owned real property located within the Carousel Housing Tract, located in Carson, California, who received amounts, incurred expenses, or received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046.

(d) The payor under the Revised Remedial Action Plan, Relocation Plan, developed by URS Corporation for Shell Oil
 Products U.S., dated September 19, 2014, and the payor or payors of the settlement proceeds arising out of or pursuant to California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region Order R4-2011-0046, shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, an annual list of names, addresses, payment dates, and amounts paid to qualified taxpayers.

(e) (1) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) If the credit or refund of any overpayment of tax resulting from the application of this section to a period before the effective date of this section is prevented as of such date by the operation of any law or rule of law, including res judicata, such credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the one-year period
 beginning on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 887, Sec. 3.   (SB 343)   Effective September 28, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.9.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any amount received as a rebate, voucher, or other financial incentive issued by a public water system, local government, or state agency for participation in a turf replacement water conservation program.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “public water system”
 shall have the same meaning as in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2142)   Effective September 28, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24308.10.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2031, gross income shall not include any amount received by a qualified taxpayer as a California qualified wildfire loss mitigation payment.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “California qualified wildfire loss mitigation payment” means any grant, rebate, direct assistance, or other financial assistance for wildfire mitigation, home hardening, structure hardening, vegetation management, defensible space, fuel modification activities, or community wildfire resilience received through either of the following:

(A) The California Wildfire Mitigation Financial Assistance Program under Article 16.5 (commencing with Section 8654.2) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(B) A wildfire mitigation grant program under Section 91510 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that owns the structure for which a California qualified wildfire loss mitigation payment was received.

(3) “Wildfire loss mitigation” means an activity that reduces wildfire risks to a residential structure or its contents, or both.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.   (SB 195)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.

Gross income does not include income (other than rent) derived by a lessor of real property on the termination of a lease, representing the value of such property attributable to buildings erected or other improvements made by the lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.1.

(a) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from Southern California Edison in settlement for claims relating to the 2017
 Thomas Fire or the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means either of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Ventura or Santa Barbara during the 2017 Thomas Fire who paid and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2017 Thomas Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Ventura or Santa Barbara during the 2017 Thomas Fire who paid
 and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2017 Thomas Fire.

(C) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Ventura or Los Angeles during the 2018 Woolsey Fire who paid and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(D) Any taxpayer that had a
 place of business within the County of Ventura or Los Angeles during the 2018 Woolsey Fire who paid
 and incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2018 Woolsey Fire.

(3) “Settlement entity” means the entity making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2).

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) (1) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) If the credit or
 refund of any overpayment of tax resulting from the application of this section to a period before the effective date of this section is prevented as of that date by the operation of any law or rule of law, including res judicata, that credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the one-year period beginning on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1,
 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 841, Sec. 3.   (SB 1246)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.2.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2030, gross income shall not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer in the taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received from a settlement entity by a qualified taxpayer in connection with a qualified wildfire disaster in California.

(2) “Qualified
 taxpayer” means any of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer that owns real property located in an area damaged by a
 qualified wildfire disaster that paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the qualified wildfire disaster.

(B) Any taxpayer that has a place of business within an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster that paid or incurred expenses, and received
 qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the qualified wildfire disaster.

(3) “Qualified wildfire disaster” means any disaster arising from a wildfire for which either the Governor has declared a state of emergency or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster as defined under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.).

(4) “Settlement entity” means an entity making a settlement payment of a qualified amount to a qualified taxpayer.

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board or qualified taxpayer, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board or the qualified taxpayer.

(d) The qualified taxpayer shall provide, upon request, all necessary information in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 112, Sec. 2.   (SB 159)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.3.

(a) Gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from the Fire Victims Trust, established pursuant to the order of the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Northern District of California dated June 20, 2020, case number 19-30088, docket number 8053.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the
 following:

(A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Amador or Calaveras during the 2015 Butte Fire who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2015 Butte Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Napa, Sonoma, Lake, Butte, Mendocino, or Solano during the 2017 North Bay Fires who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to one or more of the 2017 North Bay Fires.

(C) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Butte during the 2018 Camp Fire who incurred and paid expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or
 pursuant to the 2018 Camp Fire.

(c) The Fire Victims Trust, shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, an annual list of names, addresses, payment dates, and qualified amounts paid to qualified taxpayers.

(d) (1) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) If the credit or refund of any overpayment of tax resulting from the application of this section to a period before the effective date of this section is prevented as of that date by the operation of any law or rule of law, including res judicata, that credit or refund may nevertheless be allowed or made if the claim therefor is filed before the close of the
 one-year period beginning on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   (AB 1249)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.5.

Section 110 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified lessee construction allowances for short-term leases, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 110(b) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “(including for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 24349)” for the phrase “(including for purposes of Section 168(i)(8)(B).”

(b) Section 110(c)(2) of the Internal
 Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “(as determined under the rules of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 24349)” for the phrase “(as determined under the rules of Section 168(i)(3)).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 78.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.6.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2028, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means either of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Sonoma during the 2019 Kincade Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Sonoma during the 2019 Kincade Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(3) “Settlement entity” means Pacific Gas and Electric Company or its subsidiary that is making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 13.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.7.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2028, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means either of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Shasta or the County of Tehama during the 2020 Zogg Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Shasta or the County of Tehama during the 2020 Zogg Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(3) “Settlement entity” means Pacific Gas and Electric Company or its subsidiary that is making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 14.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.9.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2029, gross income does not include any Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount received by a taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event” means the elevated temperature landfill event, beginning on May 1, 2022, that occurred beneath the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles, California.

(2) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment” means any amount received by a taxpayer on or after March 1, 2024, as compensation
 for loss, damages, expenses, relocation, suffering, loss in real property value, closing costs with respect to real property, including realtor commissions, or inconvenience, including access to real property, resulting from the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event, if the amount was provided by either of the following:

(A) A federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(B) Waste Connections, Inc., any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of Waste Connections, Inc., or any person related to Waste Connections, Inc.

(c) The payor shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) This
 section shall remain operative only until December 1, 2029, and is repealed as of that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 21.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24310.

(a) Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recovery of tax benefit items, shall apply, except as otherwise provided. 

(b) Sections 111(b) and 111(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credits and treatment of credit carryovers, shall be applicable with respect to credits allowable under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 58.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

24310.5.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, gross income does not include any payment made pursuant to Section 6417 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, relating to elective payment of applicable credits. Sections 6417(c)(1)(C) and 6417(c)(1)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, shall apply.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
 2026, and before January 1, 2031, gross income does not include any payment made pursuant to Section 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, relating to transfer of certain credits.

(1) Sections 6418(c)(1)(A) and 6418(c)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169, shall apply.

(2) No deduction shall be allowed for any amount paid in consideration of a transfer made as described in Section 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169.

(c) For purposes of this section, “payment made pursuant to Section 6418 of the Internal Revenue Code” includes the value of a credit received by a transferee pursuant to Section 6418 of
 the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Public Law 117-169.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 215, Sec. 3.   (SB 302)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24311.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after September 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2025, gross income does not include grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Microbusiness COVID-19 Relief Program that is administered by the Office of Small Business Advocate pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 12100.90) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Section 41 shall not apply to the exclusion allowed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 23.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24312.

(a) Gross income does not include any of the following grant allocations:

(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the COVID-19 Relief Grant that is administered by the Office of Small Business Advocate, is funded by Executive Order No. E 20/21-182, and is described in a letter from the Department of Finance to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, dated December 17, 2020, entitled, “Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account Request—Increased Funding for the California Rebuilding Fund and Funding to Support a New COVID-19 Relief Grant for Small Businesses.”

(2) For taxable years beginning on
 or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Small Business COVID-19 Relief Grant Program established by Section 12100.83 of the Government Code.

(3) For taxable years beginning on or after September 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Venues Grant Program established by Section 12100.83.5 of the Government Code.

(4) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Small Business and Nonprofit COVID-19 Supplemental Paid Sick Leave Relief Grant Program established by Section 12100.975 of the Government Code.

(b) Section 41 shall not apply to the exclusion allowed by this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Franchise Tax Board may include in audits the grants referenced in this section.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary and appropriate to implement this section.

(e) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until
 December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 736, Sec. 6.   (AB 152)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24314.

The following phrase (or its substantial equivalent) in other codes or statutes does not exempt the gain or loss from the sale or transfer of bonds from the provisions of this part:

“The issuance, transfer and interest income earned on any bonds issued by an agency (state or local) under this article (chapter, section, etc.) is exempt from taxation of every kind by any state or local entity.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 317, Sec. 2.   Effective July 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

24315.

Gross income does not include any amount received for empty beverage containers by a consumer from a recycling center or recycling location as the recycling value, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14502) of Division 12.1 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Exclusions [24320. - 24329.]

24320.

Income derived from the operation of aircraft or a ship or ships by a corporation organized under the laws of a foreign country shall not be included in gross income, and shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by this part if:

(a) The aircraft are registered or the ships are documented under the laws of the foreign country;

(b) The income of the corporation is exempt from national income taxes by reason of a treaty or agreement between such foreign country and the United States which provides for an equivalent exemption to corporations
 organized in the United States; and

(c) Units of government (other than at the national level) within such foreign country do not impose a tax upon corporations organized in the United States with respect to income derived from the operation of aircraft registered or ships documented under the laws of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1191.)
-------------------------------------------

24321.

Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, regulation, rule or decision to the contrary, no city, county, city and county, governmental subdivision, district, public and quasi-public corporation, municipal corporation, whether incorporated or not or whether chartered or not, shall levy or collect or cause to be levied or collected any tax upon income which is excludable from gross income and exempt from state taxes pursuant to Section 24320.

This section shall not be construed to authorize any such entity to levy a tax on, according to, or measured by, income or profits paid or accrued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1191.)
-------------------------------------------

24322.

(a) Gross income of a domestic building and loan association, as defined in Section 7701(a)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, does not include any amount of money or other property received from the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation pursuant to Section 406(f) of the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. Section 1729(f)), regardless of whether any note or other instrument is issued in exchange therefor.

(b) No reduction in the basis of assets of a domestic building
 and loan association shall be made on account of money or other property received under the circumstances referred to in subdivision (a).

(c) Section 24425 shall not deny any deductions by reason of the deductions being allocable to amounts excluded from gross income under this section.

(d) This section shall not apply with respect to any amounts excludable under subdivision (a) received after December 31, 1988, in taxable years ending after that date, unless the payments are made by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation pursuant to an acquisition or merger which occurred on or before December 31, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24323.

Any amount received as a rebate from a local water agency or supplier for any expenses the taxpayer paid or incurred for the purchase or installation of each water conservation water closet that meets the performance standards of the American National Standards Institute Standard A112.19.2 and uses no more than 1.6 gallons per flush, shall be treated as a refund or price adjustment of amounts payable to that water agency or supplier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 809, Sec. 2.   Effective September 14, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

24324.

(a) Gross income does not include any contribution to the capital of the taxpayer.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “contribution to the capital of the taxpayer” includes any amount of money or other property received from any person (whether or not a shareholder) by a regulated public utility that provides electric energy, gas (through a local distribution system or transportation by pipeline), water, or sewerage disposal services if all of the
 following apply:

(A) The amount is contribution in aid of construction. 

(B) Where the contribution is in property that is other than electric energy, gas steam, water, or sewerage disposal facilities, the amount meets the requirements of the expenditure rule of paragraph (2). 

(C) The amounts (or any property acquired or constructed with those amounts) are not included in the taxpayer’s rate base for ratemaking purposes.

(2) An amount meets the requirements of this paragraph if all of the following apply:

(A) An amount equal to that amount is expended for the acquisition or construction of tangible property described in Section 1231(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and both of the
 following apply:

(i) The expenditure was the purpose motivating the contribution.

(ii) The property is used predominantly in the trade or business of furnishing electric energy, gas, steam, water, or sewerage disposal services.

(B) The expenditure referred to in subparagraph (A) occurs before the end of the second taxable year after the taxable year in which that amount was received.

(C) Accurate records are kept of the amount contributed and expenditures made on the basis of the project for which the contribution was made and on the basis of the year of contribution or expenditure. 

(3) For purposes of this section:

(A) “Contribution in aid of construction” does not include amounts paid as customer connection fees (including amounts paid to connect the customer’s line to an electric line, a gas main, a steam line, or a main water or sewer line) and amounts paid as service charges for starting or stopping services.

(B) “Contribution in aid of construction” includes amounts received by a regulated public utility from a contributor to recover the federal tax imposed upon contributions in aid of construction, provided that the method used to recover the tax is authorized by Public Utilities Commission Decision 87-09-026. 

(C) “Predominantly” means 80 percent or more. 

(D) “Regulated public utility” means a regulated public utility as defined by Section 7701(a)(33) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that it does not
 include any utility which is not required to provide electric energy, gas, water, or sewerage disposal services to members of the general public (including, in the case of a gas transmission utility, the provision of gas services by sale for resale to the general public) in its service area. 

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no deduction or credit shall be allowed for, or by reason of, the expenditure which constitutes a contribution in aid of construction to which this section applies. The adjusted basis of any property acquired with contributions in aid of construction to which this section applies shall be zero. 

(c) This section shall apply to contributions in aid of construction made on or after January 1, 1977, and before January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24325.

Section 118 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contributions to the capital of a corporation, shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 698, Sec. 20.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

24326.

(a) Section 136 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to energy conservation subsidies provided by public utilities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 136 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to energy conservation subsidies provided by public utilities, shall apply to amounts received on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 79.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24327.

Section 892 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the tax treatment of foreign governments and international organizations, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24329.

Section 139 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disaster relief payments, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 66.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Net Income [24341. - 24449.]



  ARTICLE 1. Deductions [24341. - 24383.]

24341.

“Net income” means the gross income, computed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 24271), less the deductions allowed under this article and Article 2 (commencing with Section 24401).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.

(a) Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to trade or business expenses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For purposes of applying Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code, any references to Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to refer to Sections 24357 to 24359.1, inclusive, of this part.

(c) (1) The amendments made by Section 13601(a), (b), (c), and (d) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain excessive employee remuneration, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) The amendments made by Section 13601(e)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97), relating to exception for binding contracts, shall apply, and is modified by substituting “March 31, 2019” for “November 2, 2017.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 22.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.1.

(a) The amendments made by Section 13531(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to add Section 162(r) to the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the disallowance of FDIC premiums paid by certain large financial institutions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For purposes of this section, Article 9 (commencing with Section 23361) of Chapter 2 of Part 11 shall not
 apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 23.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.2.

Whereas, the people of the State of California desire to promote and achieve tax equity and fairness among all the state’s citizens and further desire to conform to the public policy of nondiscrimination, the Legislature hereby enacts the following for these reasons and for no other purpose:

(a) No deduction shall be allowed under Section 24343 for expenses incurred by a taxpayer with respect to expenditures made
 at, or payments made to, a club which restricts membership or the use of its services or facilities on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, except for genetic information.

(b) A club described in subdivision (a) holding an alcoholic beverage license pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code, except a club holding an alcoholic beverage license pursuant to Section 23425 thereof, shall provide on each receipt furnished to a taxpayer a printed statement as follows:

“The expenditures covered by this receipt are nondeductible for state income tax purposes or franchise tax purposes.”

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Expenses” means those expenses otherwise
 deductible under Section 24343, except for subdivision (a), and includes, but is not limited to, club membership dues and assessments, food and beverage expenses, expenses for services furnished by the club, and reimbursements or salary adjustments to officers or employees for any of the preceding expenses.

(2) “Club” means a club as defined in Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code, except a club as defined in Section 23425 thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 261, Sec. 23.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.3.

Any employer contribution to a medical savings account, as defined in Section 220 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to medical savings accounts, if otherwise deductible under this part, shall be allowed only for the taxable year in which paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.5.

(a) In addition to the deduction allowed by Section 24343, a deduction shall be allowed to an employer as an ordinary and necessary expense paid or incurred during the taxable year in carrying on any trade or business for those expenses involved in any of the following ridesharing arrangements:

(1) Subsidizing employees commuting in vanpools.

(2) Subsidizing employees commuting in private commuter buses or
 buspools.

(3) Subsidizing monthly transit passes for its employees or for use by the employee’s dependents, except that no deduction shall be allowed for transit passes issued for the use of elementary and secondary school students.

(4) Subsidizing employees commuting in subscription taxipools.

(5) Subsidizing employees commuting in a carpool.

(6) In the case of an employer who offers free parking to its employees, offering a cash equivalent to employees who do not require parking, including a parking cash-out program, as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 65088.1 of the Government Code.

(7) Providing free or preferential parking to carpools, vanpools, or any other vehicle used in a
 ridesharing arrangement.

(8) Making facility improvements to encourage employees, for the purpose of commuting from their homes, to participate in ridesharing arrangements, to use bicycles, or to walk. These facility improvements may include, but are not limited to, any of the following: the construction of bus shelters; the installation of bicycle racks and other bicycle-related facilities, such as showers and locker rooms; and parking lot modifications to provide carpools, vanpools, or buspools with preferential treatment. The cost of these facility improvements shall be allowed as a depreciation deduction. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the depreciation deduction shall be allowable over a 36-month period.

(9) Providing company commuter van or bus service to its employees and to others for commuting from their homes, but not for transportation required as part of the
 employer’s business activities, except as otherwise provided in this section. The capital costs of providing this service shall not be an eligible deduction under this section.
